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Engine and ECT ECU

DI−42
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DTC P07 17/37 InputSpeedSensorCircuitNoSignal

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The speed sensor NT detects the rotation speed of the input
shaft from the rotation of the drum. Its construction is the same
as that of the speed sensor SP2.
By comparing the speed sensor NT signal and speed sensor
SP2 signal, the Engine and ECT ECU detects the shift timing
of the gears and appropriately controls the engine torque and
hydraulic pressure in response to various conditions, thus do-
ing smooth gear shift.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0717/37

All conditions below are detected for 5 secs. or more
(1−tripdetection logic)
(a) Gear change not being performed
(b) Gear range: 1st, 2nd, 3rd, 4th or 5th
(c)T/M inputshaft rpm:300rpmor less
(d) T/M output shaft rpm: 1,000 rpm or more
(e) Neutral start switch: OFF
(f) Shift solenoid valves, park/neutral posotion switch and ve-

hicle speed sensor are in normal operation

SOpenorshort inspeedsensorNTcircuit
SSpeedsensorNT
SEngineandECTECU
SAutomatic transmissionassembly
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check speed sensor NT.

PREPARATION:
Remove the speed sensor NT.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between the sensor terminals.

Standard: 560 − 680 � at 20˚ C (68 ˚ F)
(b) Measure the voltage between the sensor terminals when

a magnet is put close to the front end of the sensor then
kept away quickly.
Standard: Sensor generates voltage intermittently

HINT:
The generated voltage is extremely low.
OK:

Standard.

NG Replace speed sensor NT.

OK

2 Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU and speed sensor
NT (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).


